Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0408.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 43510. (1) Subject to subsection (2), except as provided in section 43513, and except for an individual hunting on a game bird hunting preserve licensed under part 417, an individual shall not carry or transport a firearm, slingshot, bow and arrow, crossbow, or a trap while in any area frequented by wild animals unless that individual has in his or her that individual's possession a license as required under this part. (2) This act or a rule promulgated or order issued by the department or the commission under this act shall does not be construed to prohibit an individual from transporting a pistol or carrying a loaded pistol, whether concealed or not. , if either of the following applies: (a) The individual has in his or her possession a license to carry a concealed pistol under 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.421 to 28.435. (b) The individual is authorized under the circumstances to carry a concealed pistol without obtaining a license to carry a concealed pistol under 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.421 to 28.435, as provided for under any of the following: (i) Section 12a of 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.432a. (ii) Section 227, 227a, 231, or 231a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.227, 750.227a, 750.231, and 750.231a. (3) Subsection (2) does not authorize an individual to take or attempt to take a wild animal except as provided by law. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 406 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.